Hawaii statutes.
§660-21 Procedure in case of sickness, etc.
When from sickness or infirmity of the person, the person cannot properly be
brought to the place appointed for the return, that fact shall be set forth,
and if verified by affidavit and established to the satisfaction of the court,
the hearing may be adjourned to such other time or place or such order may be
made as justice may require. [L 1870, c 32, §16; RL 1925, §2744; RL 1935,
§4329; RL 1945, §10370; RL 1955, §239-21; HRS §660-21; am L 1972, c 90, §5(n);
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next